incubator/apertium-ell-eng/apertium-ell-eng.ell.dix
    <pardef n="κλ/άδεμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>άδεμα</l><r>άδεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άδεμα</l><r>άδεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αδέματος</l><r>άδεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άδεμα</l><r>άδεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αδέματα</l><r>άδεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αδέματα</l><r>άδεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αδεμάτων</l><r>άδεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αδέματα</l><r>άδεμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="θρα/ύσμα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ύσμα</l><r>ύσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύσμα</l><r>ύσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύσματος</l><r>ύσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύσμα</l><r>ύσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύσματα</l><r>ύσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύσματα</l><r>ύσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υσμάτων</l><r>ύσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύσματα</l><r>ύσμα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ταβ/έρνα__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>έρνα</l><r>έρνα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρνα</l><r>έρνα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρνας</l><r>έρνα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρνα</l><r>έρνα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρνες</l><r>έρνα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρνες</l><r>έρνα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ερνών</l><r>έρνα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>έρνες</l><r>έρνα<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="θερμοπ/ίδακας__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ίδακας</l><r>ίδακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίδακα</l><r>ίδακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίδακα</l><r>ίδακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίδακα</l><r>ίδακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίδακες</l><r>ίδακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίδακες</l><r>ίδακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιδάκων</l><r>ίδακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίδακες</l><r>ίδακας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="σκουλ/ήκι__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ήκι</l><r>ήκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήκι</l><r>ήκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηκιού</l><r>ήκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήκι</l><r>ήκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήκια</l><r>ήκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήκια</l><r>ήκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ηκιών</l><r>ήκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ήκια</l><r>ήκι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="μπουντρο/ύμι__n_nt">
      <e><p>          <l>ύμι</l><r>ύμι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμι</l><r>ύμι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υμιού</l><r>ύμι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμι</l><r>ύμι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμια</l><r>ύμι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμια</l><r>ύμι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>υμιών</l><r>ύμι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ύμια</l><r>ύμι<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="παρεν/όχληση__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>όχληση</l><r>όχληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όχληση</l><r>όχληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όχλησης</l><r>όχληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οχλήσεως</l><r>όχληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>όχληση</l><r>όχληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οχλήσεις</l><r>όχληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οχλήσεις</l><r>όχληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οχλήσεων</l><r>όχληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>οχλήσεις</l><r>όχληση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="επ/ίφυση__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ίφυση</l><r>ίφυση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίφυση</l><r>ίφυση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίφυσης</l><r>ίφυση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιφύσεως</l><r>ίφυση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ίφυση</l><r>ίφυση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιφύσεις</l><r>ίφυση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιφύσεις</l><r>ίφυση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιφύσεων</l><r>ίφυση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ιφύσεις</l><r>ίφυση<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/άξονας__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>άξονας</l><r>άξονας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άξονα</l><r>άξονας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άξονα</l><r>άξονας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άξονα</l><r>άξονας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άξονες</l><r>άξονας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άξονες</l><r>άξονας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>αξόνων</l><r>άξονας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>άξονες</l><r>άξονας<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="άξονας"><i></i><par n="/άξονας__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="επίφυση"><i>επ</i><par n="επ/ίφυση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="θερμοπίδακας"><i>θερμοπ</i><par n="θερμοπ/ίδακας__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="θραύσμα"><i>θρα</i><par n="θρα/ύσμα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="κλάδεμα"><i>κλ</i><par n="κλ/άδεμα__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="μπουντρούμι"><i>μπουντρο</i><par n="μπουντρο/ύμι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="παρενόχληση"><i>παρεν</i><par n="παρεν/όχληση__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="σκουλήκι"><i>σκουλ</i><par n="σκουλ/ήκι__n_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ταβέρνα"><i>ταβ</i><par n="ταβ/έρνα__n_nt"/></e>
